Hawaii statutes.
§414-404 Appeal from denial of
reinstatement. (a) If the department director denies a corporation's
application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the
department director shall mail a written notice to the corporation or its
designated representative that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b) The corporation may appeal the denial of
reinstatement to the circuit court within thirty days after the notice of
denial is mailed. The corporation may appeal by petitioning the court to set
aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the department
director's certificate of dissolution, the corporation's application for
reinstatement, and the department director's notice of denial.

(c) The court may summarily order the
department director to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other
action the court considers appropriate.

(d) The court's final decision may be appealed
as in other civil proceedings. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §10]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next